Washington statutes.
RCW 11.48.010

General powers and duties.

It shall be the duty of every personal representative to settle the estate, including the administration of any nonprobate assets within control of the personal representative under RCW 11.18.200, in his or her hands as rapidly and as quickly as possible, without sacrifice to the probate or nonprobate estate. The personal representative shall collect all debts due the deceased and pay all debts as hereinafter provided. The personal representative shall be authorized in his or her own name to maintain and prosecute such actions as pertain to the management and settlement of the estate, and may institute suit to collect any debts due the estate or to recover any property, real or personal, or for trespass of any kind or character.

[ 1994 c 221 s 30; 1965 c 145 s 11.48.010. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 147; RRS s 1517; prior: Code 1881 s 1528; 1854 p 291 s 141.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1994 c 221: See note following RCW 11.100.035.